Washington statutes.
RCW 15.17.170

Inspection certificate or other official document as evidence.

Every inspection certificate or other official document issued by the director under the provisions of this chapter shall be received in all the courts of the state as prima facie evidence of the statements therein.

[ 1998 c 154 s 11; 1963 c 122 s 17.]